Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4820.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 213. (1) As used in this section, : (a) "Fund" means the motor transport revolving fund created in subsection (4). (b) "Motor "motor vehicle" means a passenger vehicle, van, minibus, bus, truck, tractor, or other motorized vehicle. (2) The Except as otherwise provided in section 267, the department may issue directives relative to all the following for motor vehicles except for those motor vehicles under the jurisdiction of the state transportation department: (a) The purchasing, leasing, maintaining, operating, replacing, and disposing of motor vehicles for all state agencies. (b) The using of state owned state-owned motor vehicles for official business. (c) The establishing of conditions for use of privately owned motor vehicles on official business. (d) The acquiring of vehicle registration plates. (e) The maintaining of motor vehicle titles and insurance inventories. (f) The assigning of motor vehicles, permanently or temporarily, to state agencies and to institutions of higher education. (g) The establishing of rates to be charged for use of a motor vehicle. The rates shall must be reviewed periodically and shall must be sufficient to cover the costs of administration and of the acquisition, operation, maintenance, repair, and replacement of motor vehicles. (h) The displaying of distinctive vehicle registration plates and other external markings on the motor vehicles. The plates and markings shall must clearly identify state ownership unless the motor vehicle is used by an elected official, or for an investigative use, or anonymity is essential to properly perform a necessary function of state government as determined by the director. (3) The department shall establish motor vehicle repair centers and motor pools. (4) The motor transport revolving fund is hereby created. The revenue received from rates charged pursuant to under subsection (2)(g) and revenue which that is received from any other source and designated to be credited to the motor transport revolving fund shall must be credited to the motor transport revolving fund. The amounts in the motor vehicle transport revolving fund are continuously appropriated only for administration and the acquisition, lease, operation, maintenance, repair, and replacement of state owned state-owned motor vehicles and related capital outlay and equipment. (5) Assets and liabilities of the motor transport revolving fund shall be considered are assets and liabilities of the motor transport revolving fund created by this section. (6) Not later than January 1, 2007, the director shall install the necessary fueling infrastructure or contract with a supplier to supply alternative fuels at all state motor transport facilities so that all state owned state-owned vehicles capable of utilizing alternative fuels are able to use them. As used in this subsection, "alternative fuel" means E85 fuel and biodiesel fuel blends. Sec. 267. (1) The department shall issue directives to provide for the disclosure, transfer, and disposal of surplus personal property of state agencies. Except as otherwise provided in subsection subsections (4) and (5), the department may dispose of surplus personal property by donating the surplus personal property any of the following means: (a) Donating it to a nonprofit entity. , or selling (b) Selling it to a unit of local government. , or selling (c) Selling it at a public sale. (2) The department may sell surplus personal property at fair market value. The department may also exchange surplus personal property for goods and services at fair market value with a private company that is contracted to provide state services, and the surplus personal property is essential to providing those services. (3) The department may pay necessary costs incurred in the conduct of the transfers or sale of surplus personal property including the necessary warehousing and reconditioning costs from the proceeds of the sale or by assessing a handling fee for surplus personal property being donated. (4) Beginning October 1, 2016, prior to Before donating, disposing of, or selling surplus snow removal equipment or surplus road construction or maintenance equipment that was owned by the state transportation department, the department shall make that equipment available for sale at fair market value to local road agencies in this state. The department shall issue directives to implement this subsection. As used in this subsection, "local road agencies" means a local road agency as that term is defined in section 9a of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.659a. (5) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, before donating, disposing of, or selling a surplus motor vehicle of a state agency, the department shall make the motor vehicle available for sale to foster youth using a voucher system. (6) The department shall issue directives to implement subsections (4) and (5). (7) As used in this section: (a) "Foster youth" means individuals who are over the age of 16 years old who are in the youth in transition program. (b) "Local road agency" means a local road agency, as that term is defined in section 9a of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.659a.